Massachusetts, session 194th, H3834.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Any city or town in the Commonwealth may, subject to the approvals of
the commissioner of revenue and the legislative body of the city or town, designate a place on its
municipal tax bills, or the motor vehicle excise tax bills, or mail with such tax bills a separate
form whereby taxpayers of the city or town can voluntarily check off, donate and pledge an
amount of money which shall increase the amount already due and which shall be paid over to an
account under the supervision of the local veterans agent for the support of veterans and
dependents in need.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1